Maryland, session 2025, SB0497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–319.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MARYLAND ONESTOP” MEANS THE
INTERNET–BASED STATEWIDE LICENSING PORTAL MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0497*

SENATE BILL 497
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, AND EVERY 2 MONTHS
THEREAFTER, IN COORDINATION WITH EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE AS NEEDED ALL LICENSES, FORMS, CERTIFICATES,
PERMITS, APPLICATIONS, AND REGISTRATIONS AVAILABLE ON MARYLAND
ONESTOP.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, IN COORDINATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT, EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL MAKE
AVAILABLE ON MARYLAND ONESTOP ALL COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL LICENSES,
FORMS, CERTIFICATES, PERMITS, APPLICATIONS, AND REGISTRATIONS.
(2) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 MONTHS
THEREAFTER, EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL UPDATE AS
NEEDED ALL COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL LICENSES, FORMS, CERTIFICATES, PERMITS,
APPLICATIONS, AND REGISTRATIONS AVAILABLE ON MARYLAND ONESTOP.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.